District of Columbia statutes.
13-338

Prerequisites for order of publication.

An order for the substitution of publication for personal service may not be made until:

(1)

a summons for the defendant has been issued and returned “Not to be found,” and

(2)

the nonresidence of the defendant or his absence for at least six months is proved by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 514, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 13-338.
1973 Ed., § 13-338.